Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB705.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1302-D(g) of the act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the Pennsylvania Election Code, is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 1302-D. Applications for official mail-in ballots.* * *(a.1) Application restriction.--Only the Department of State or a county board of election of a county in which a qualified elector's voting residence is located may send an application to 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 a qualified elector for an official mail-in ballot under this article.* * *[(g) Permanent mail-in voting list.--(1) Any qualified registered elector may request to be placed on a permanent mail-in ballot list file at any time during the calendar year. A mail-in ballot application shall be mailed to every person otherwise eligible to receive a mail-in ballot application by the first Monday in February each year or within 48 hours of receipt of the request, whichever is later, so long as the person does not lose the person's voting rights by failure to vote as otherwise required by this act. A mail-in ballot application mailed to an elector under this section, which is completed and timely returned by the elector, shall serve as an application for any and all primary, general or special elections to be held in the remainder of that calendar year and for all special elections to be held before the third Monday in February of the succeeding year.(2) The Secretary of the Commonwealth may develop an electronic system through which all qualified electors may apply for a mail-in ballot and request permanent mail-in voter status under this section, provided the system is able to capture a digitized or electronic signature of the applicant. A county board of elections shall treat an application or request received through the electronic system as if the application or request had been submitted on a paper form or any other format used by the county.(3) The transfer of a qualified registered elector on a permanent mail-in voting list from one county to another 20250SB0705PN0721 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 county shall only be permitted upon the request of the qualified registered elector.]Section 2. All regulations and parts of regulations are abrogated to the extent of any inconsistency with the provisions of this act.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0705PN0721 - 3 - 123456